Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB18.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 190.033 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a motor vehicle dealer's license, new recreational vehicle
dealer's license, motor vehicle auction dealer's license, or wholesaler's license shall not be issued or renewed
unless the applicant or holder of the license has[shall have] on file with the commission an approved
indemnifying bond or insurance policy that complies with subsection (2) of this section.
(2) An indemnifying bond or insurance policy shall:
(a) Be issued by:
1. A surety company or insurance carrier authorized to transact business within the Commonwealth
of Kentucky; or
2. A nonadmitted insurer in accordance with the requirements of Subtitle 10 of KRS Chapter
304;[. ]
(b) Have a[The] term that is[of the bond or policy shall be] continuous and remains[shall remain] in full
force until canceled under proper notice;
(c) [. All bonds or policies shall ]Be issued in the name of the holder or applicant for the dealer's license or
wholesaler's license;[. ]
(d) [The bond or policy ]For all dealers except automotive recycling dealers, provide[shall provide] public
liability and property damage coverage for the operation of any vehicle owned or being offered for sale
by the dealer or wholesaler when being operated by the owner or seller, his or her agents, servants,
employees, prospective customers, or other persons. In circumstances where a customer's or other
person's vehicle is out of use because of breakdown, repair, or servicing and a motor vehicle is loaned,
with or without consideration, the coverage mandated by this section shall be in excess of, and be
deemed secondary to, the collision, bodily injury, and property damage liability coverage under a
customer's or other person's own coverage for that person's own negligence; otherwise the coverage
mandated by this section shall be primary;[.]
(e)[(2)] Provide that the amount of coverage under the bond or policy is[insurance shall be] two
hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for bodily injury or death of any one (1) person; five hundred
thousand dollars ($500,000) for bodily injury or death in any one (1) accident; and two hundred fifty
thousand dollars ($250,000) property damage;[. ]
(f) [The bond or policy ]For automotive recycling dealers, provide[ shall provide] commercial general
liability coverage in the amount of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for bodily injury or
death of any one (1) person; five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for bodily injury or death in any
one (1) accident; and two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) property damage; and[.]
(g)[(3)] Provide that the[A] bond or[ insurance] policy shall not be canceled unless fifteen (15) days'
notice by the bondsman or insurance carrier has been given in writing to the commission.
(3) (a) Upon the cancellation of any required indemnifying bond or insurance policy[ required], the right to
engage in the business of a motor vehicle dealer or wholesaler shall immediately abate.
(b) If the bond or insurance policy is reinstated within thirty (30) days from the date of cancellation, the
rights granted by the license shall again be in force and effect; otherwise, the license shall become void.
(4) A dealer that has a certificate of authority from the Department of Insurance demonstrating proof of self-
insurance is exempt from this section.
Signed by Governor March 15, 2025.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY